src/morphology/inflection/codifieds.lexc
! Codifieds are inflected with a colon, depending on the last letter
! of the word (or inflection class of the thing)

LEXICON CodifiedAcroStem/Common
[NUM=SG][CASE=NOM]:	Ennd	;
	Compounding/Dashed	;

LEXICON CodifiedAcroStem/a
	CodifiedAcroStem/A	;

LEXICON CodifiedAcroStem/A
	CodifiedAcroStem/Common	;
[NUM=SG][CASE=NOM]:%:	Possessive/Obligatory+Vn	;
[NUM=SG][CASE=NOM]:%:	Clitic/Obligatory	;
[NUM=PL][CASE=NOM]:%:t	Clitic/Optional	;
[NUM=SG][CASE=NOM]:%:n	Clitic/Optional	;
[NUM=SG][CASE=PAR]:%:ta	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=SG][CASE=ILL]:%:han	Possessive/Optional	;
[NUM=SG][CASE=ABE]:%:tta	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=SG][CASE=ABL]:%:lta	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=SG][CASE=ADE]:%:lla	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=SG][CASE=ALL]:%:lle	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=SG][CASE=ELA]:%:sta	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=SG][CASE=ESS]:%:na	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=SG][CASE=INE]:%:ssa	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=SG][CASE=TRA]:%:ksi	Clitic/Optional	;
[NUM=SG][CASE=TRA]:%:kse	Possessive/Obligatory+Vn	;
[NUM=PL][CASE=PAR]:%:ita	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=PL][CASE=ILL]:%:ihin	Possessive/Optional	;
[NUM=PL][CASE=ABE]:%:itta	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=PL][CASE=ABL]:%:ilta	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=PL][CASE=ADE]:%:illa	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=PL][CASE=ALL]:%:ille	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=PL][CASE=ESS]:%:ina	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[CASE=CMT]:%:ine	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=PL][CASE=ELA]:%:ista	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=PL][CASE=INE]:%:issa	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=PL][CASE=INS]:%:in	Clitic/Optional	;
[NUM=PL][CASE=TRA]:%:iksi	Clitic/Optional	;
[NUM=PL][CASE=TRA]:%:ikse	Possessive/Obligatory+Vn	;

LEXICON CodifiedAcroStem/b
	CodifiedAcroStem/ee	;

LEXICON CodifiedAcroStem/B
	CodifiedAcroStem/ee	;

LEXICON CodifiedAcroStem/c
	CodifiedAcroStem/ee	;

LEXICON CodifiedAcroStem/C
	CodifiedAcroStem/ee	;

LEXICON CodifiedAcroStem/d
	CodifiedAcroStem/ee	;

LEXICON CodifiedAcroStem/D
	CodifiedAcroStem/ee	;

LEXICON CodifiedAcroStem/e
	CodifiedAcroStem/ee	;

LEXICON CodifiedAcroStem/E
	CodifiedAcroStem/ee	;

LEXICON CodifiedAcroStem/g
	CodifiedAcroStem/ee	;

LEXICON CodifiedAcroStem/G
	CodifiedAcroStem/ee	;

LEXICON CodifiedAcroStem/p
	CodifiedAcroStem/ee	;

LEXICON CodifiedAcroStem/P
	CodifiedAcroStem/ee	;

LEXICON CodifiedAcroStem/v
	CodifiedAcroStem/ee	;

LEXICON CodifiedAcroStem/V
	CodifiedAcroStem/ee	;

LEXICON CodifiedAcroStem/w
	CodifiedAcroStem/ee	;

LEXICON CodifiedAcroStem/W
	CodifiedAcroStem/ee	;

LEXICON CodifiedAcroStem/t
	CodifiedAcroStem/ee	;

LEXICON CodifiedAcroStem/T
	CodifiedAcroStem/ee	;

LEXICON CodifiedAcroStem/ee
	CodifiedAcroStem/Common	;
[NUM=SG][CASE=NOM]:%:	Possessive/Obligatory+Vn	;
[NUM=SG][CASE=NOM]:%:	Clitic/Obligatory	;
[NUM=PL][CASE=NOM]:%:t	Clitic/Optional	;
[NUM=SG][CASE=NOM]:%:n	Clitic/Optional	;
[NUM=SG][CASE=PAR]:%:tä	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=SG][CASE=ILL]:%:hen	Possessive/Optional	;
[NUM=SG][CASE=ABE]:%:ttä	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=SG][CASE=ABL]:%:ltä	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=SG][CASE=ADE]:%:llä	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=SG][CASE=ALL]:%:lle	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=SG][CASE=ELA]:%:stä	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=SG][CASE=ESS]:%:nä	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=SG][CASE=INE]:%:ssä	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=SG][CASE=TRA]:%:ksi	Clitic/Optional	;
[NUM=SG][CASE=TRA]:%:kse	Possessive/Obligatory+Vn	;
[NUM=PL][CASE=PAR]:%:itä	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=PL][CASE=ILL]:%:ihin	Possessive/Optional	;
[NUM=PL][CASE=ABE]:%:ittä	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=PL][CASE=ABL]:%:iltä	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=PL][CASE=ADE]:%:illä	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=PL][CASE=ALL]:%:ille	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=PL][CASE=ESS]:%:inä	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[CASE=CMT]:%:ine	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=PL][CASE=ELA]:%:istä	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=PL][CASE=INE]:%:issä	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=PL][CASE=INS]:%:in	Clitic/Optional	;
[NUM=PL][CASE=TRA]:%:iksi	Clitic/Optional	;
[NUM=PL][CASE=TRA]:%:ikse	Possessive/Obligatory+Vn	;

LEXICON CodifiedAcroStem/i
	CodifiedAcroStem/ii	;

LEXICON CodifiedAcroStem/I
	CodifiedAcroStem/ii	;

LEXICON CodifiedAcroStem/j
	CodifiedAcroStem/ii	;

LEXICON CodifiedAcroStem/J
	CodifiedAcroStem/ii	;

LEXICON CodifiedAcroStem/ii
	CodifiedAcroStem/Common	;
[NUM=SG][CASE=NOM]:%:	Possessive/Obligatory+Vn	;
[NUM=SG][CASE=NOM]:%:	Clitic/Obligatory	;
[NUM=PL][CASE=NOM]:%:t	Clitic/Optional	;
[NUM=SG][CASE=NOM]:%:n	Clitic/Optional	;
[NUM=SG][CASE=PAR]:%:tä	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=SG][CASE=ILL]:%:hin	Possessive/Optional	;
[NUM=SG][CASE=ABE]:%:ttä	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=SG][CASE=ABL]:%:ltä	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=SG][CASE=ADE]:%:llä	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=SG][CASE=ALL]:%:lle	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=SG][CASE=ELA]:%:stä	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=SG][CASE=ESS]:%:nä	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=SG][CASE=INE]:%:ssä	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=SG][CASE=TRA]:%:ksi	Clitic/Optional	;
[NUM=SG][CASE=TRA]:%:kse	Possessive/Obligatory+Vn	;
[NUM=PL][CASE=PAR]:%:itä	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=PL][CASE=ILL]:%:ihin	Possessive/Optional	;
[NUM=PL][CASE=ABE]:%:ittä	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=PL][CASE=ABL]:%:iltä	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=PL][CASE=ADE]:%:illä	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=PL][CASE=ALL]:%:ille	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=PL][CASE=ESS]:%:inä	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[CASE=CMT]:%:ine	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=PL][CASE=ELA]:%:istä	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=PL][CASE=INE]:%:issä	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=PL][CASE=INS]:%:in	Clitic/Optional	;
[NUM=PL][CASE=TRA]:%:iksi	Clitic/Optional	;
[NUM=PL][CASE=TRA]:%:ikse	Possessive/Obligatory+Vn	;

LEXICON CodifiedAcroStem/h
	CodifiedAcroStem/oo	;

LEXICON CodifiedAcroStem/H
	CodifiedAcroStem/oo	;

LEXICON CodifiedAcroStem/k
	CodifiedAcroStem/oo	;

LEXICON CodifiedAcroStem/K
	CodifiedAcroStem/oo	;

LEXICON CodifiedAcroStem/o
	CodifiedAcroStem/oo	;

LEXICON CodifiedAcroStem/O
	CodifiedAcroStem/oo	;

LEXICON CodifiedAcroStem/å
	CodifiedAcroStem/oo	;

LEXICON CodifiedAcroStem/Å
	CodifiedAcroStem/oo	;

LEXICON CodifiedAcroStem/oo
	CodifiedAcroStem/Common	;
[NUM=SG][CASE=NOM]:%:	Possessive/Obligatory+Vn	;
[NUM=SG][CASE=NOM]:%:	Clitic/Obligatory	;
[NUM=PL][CASE=NOM]:%:t	Clitic/Optional	;
[NUM=SG][CASE=NOM]:%:n	Clitic/Optional	;
[NUM=SG][CASE=PAR]:%:ta	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=SG][CASE=ILL]:%:hon	Possessive/Optional	;
[NUM=SG][CASE=ABE]:%:tta	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=SG][CASE=ABL]:%:lta	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=SG][CASE=ADE]:%:lla	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=SG][CASE=ALL]:%:lle	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=SG][CASE=ELA]:%:sta	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=SG][CASE=ESS]:%:na	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=SG][CASE=INE]:%:ssa	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=SG][CASE=TRA]:%:ksi	Clitic/Optional	;
[NUM=SG][CASE=TRA]:%:kse	Possessive/Obligatory+Vn	;
[NUM=PL][CASE=PAR]:%:ita	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=PL][CASE=ILL]:%:ihin	Possessive/Optional	;
[NUM=PL][CASE=ABE]:%:itta	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=PL][CASE=ABL]:%:ilta	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=PL][CASE=ADE]:%:illa	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=PL][CASE=ALL]:%:ille	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=PL][CASE=ESS]:%:ina	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[CASE=CMT]:%:ine	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=PL][CASE=ELA]:%:ista	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=PL][CASE=INE]:%:issa	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=PL][CASE=INS]:%:in	Clitic/Optional	;
[NUM=PL][CASE=TRA]:%:iksi	Clitic/Optional	;
[NUM=PL][CASE=TRA]:%:ikse	Possessive/Obligatory+Vn	;

LEXICON CodifiedAcroStem/q
	CodifiedAcroStem/uu	;

LEXICON CodifiedAcroStem/Q
	CodifiedAcroStem/uu	;

LEXICON CodifiedAcroStem/u
	CodifiedAcroStem/uu	;

LEXICON CodifiedAcroStem/U
	CodifiedAcroStem/uu	;

LEXICON CodifiedAcroStem/uu
	CodifiedAcroStem/Common	;
[NUM=SG][CASE=NOM]:%:	Possessive/Obligatory+Vn	;
[NUM=SG][CASE=NOM]:%:	Clitic/Obligatory	;
[NUM=PL][CASE=NOM]:%:t	Clitic/Optional	;
[NUM=SG][CASE=NOM]:%:n	Clitic/Optional	;
[NUM=SG][CASE=PAR]:%:ta	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=SG][CASE=ILL]:%:hun	Possessive/Optional	;
[NUM=SG][CASE=ABE]:%:tta	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=SG][CASE=ABL]:%:lta	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=SG][CASE=ADE]:%:lla	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=SG][CASE=ALL]:%:lle	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=SG][CASE=ELA]:%:sta	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=SG][CASE=ESS]:%:na	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=SG][CASE=INE]:%:ssa	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=SG][CASE=TRA]:%:ksi	Clitic/Optional	;
[NUM=SG][CASE=TRA]:%:kse	Possessive/Obligatory+Vn	;
[NUM=PL][CASE=PAR]:%:ita	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=PL][CASE=ILL]:%:ihin	Possessive/Optional	;
[NUM=PL][CASE=ABE]:%:itta	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=PL][CASE=ABL]:%:ilta	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=PL][CASE=ADE]:%:illa	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=PL][CASE=ALL]:%:ille	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=PL][CASE=ESS]:%:ina	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[CASE=CMT]:%:ine	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=PL][CASE=ELA]:%:ista	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=PL][CASE=INE]:%:issa	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=PL][CASE=INS]:%:in	Clitic/Optional	;
[NUM=PL][CASE=TRA]:%:iksi	Clitic/Optional	;
[NUM=PL][CASE=TRA]:%:ikse	Possessive/Obligatory+Vn	;

LEXICON CodifiedAcroStem/f
	CodifiedAcroStem/äX	;

LEXICON CodifiedAcroStem/F
	CodifiedAcroStem/äX	;

LEXICON CodifiedAcroStem/l
	CodifiedAcroStem/äX	;

LEXICON CodifiedAcroStem/L
	CodifiedAcroStem/äX	;

LEXICON CodifiedAcroStem/m
	CodifiedAcroStem/äX	;

LEXICON CodifiedAcroStem/M
	CodifiedAcroStem/äX	;

LEXICON CodifiedAcroStem/n
	CodifiedAcroStem/äX	;

LEXICON CodifiedAcroStem/N
	CodifiedAcroStem/äX	;

LEXICON CodifiedAcroStem/r
	CodifiedAcroStem/äX	;

LEXICON CodifiedAcroStem/R
	CodifiedAcroStem/äX	;

LEXICON CodifiedAcroStem/s
	CodifiedAcroStem/äX	;

LEXICON CodifiedAcroStem/S
	CodifiedAcroStem/äX	;

LEXICON CodifiedAcroStem/š
	CodifiedAcroStem/äX	;

LEXICON CodifiedAcroStem/Š
	CodifiedAcroStem/äX	;

LEXICON CodifiedAcroStem/x
	CodifiedAcroStem/äX	;

LEXICON CodifiedAcroStem/X
	CodifiedAcroStem/äX	;

LEXICON CodifiedAcroStem/äX
	CodifiedAcroStem/Common	;
[NUM=SG][CASE=NOM]:%:	Possessive/Obligatory+Vn	;
[NUM=SG][CASE=NOM]:%:	Clitic/Obligatory	;
[NUM=PL][CASE=NOM]:%:t	Clitic/Optional	;
[NUM=SG][CASE=NOM]:%:n	Clitic/Optional	;
[NUM=SG][CASE=PAR]:%:ää	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=SG][CASE=ILL]:%:ään	Possessive/Optional	;
[NUM=SG][CASE=ABE]:%:ttä	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=SG][CASE=ABL]:%:ltä	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=SG][CASE=ADE]:%:llä	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=SG][CASE=ALL]:%:lle	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=SG][CASE=ELA]:%:stä	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=SG][CASE=ESS]:%:nä	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=SG][CASE=INE]:%:ssä	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=SG][CASE=TRA]:%:ksi	Clitic/Optional	;
[NUM=SG][CASE=TRA]:%:kse	Possessive/Obligatory+Vn	;
[NUM=PL][CASE=PAR]:%:iä	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=PL][CASE=ILL]:%:iin	Possessive/Optional	;
[NUM=PL][CASE=ABE]:%:ittä	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=PL][CASE=ABL]:%:iltä	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=PL][CASE=ADE]:%:illä	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=PL][CASE=ALL]:%:ille	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=PL][CASE=ESS]:%:inä	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[CASE=CMT]:%:ine	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=PL][CASE=ELA]:%:istä	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=PL][CASE=INE]:%:issä	Possessive/Optional+Vn	;
[NUM=PL][CASE=INS]:%:in	Clitic/Optional	;
[NUM=PL][CASE=TRA]:%:iksi	Clitic/Optional	;
[NUM=PL][CASE=TRA]:%:ikse	Possessive/Obligatory+Vn	;

LEXICON CodifiedAcroStem/y
	CodifiedAcroStem/Y	;
